Maine, session 132, LD242.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §1311, sub-§3, ¶B, as enacted by PL 1981, c. 693, §§5 and
8, is amended to read:
B. If the proceeds of an issue of bonds are used in whole or in part to fund temporary
notes, the period during which the issue of bonds shall be is outstanding plus the period
of the loan represented by the temporary notes or renewals shall may not exceed 25 30
years.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §1490, sub-§3, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 240, Pt. XXXX,
§13, is amended to read:
B. If the proceeds of an issue of bonds are used in whole or in part to fund temporary
notes, the period during which the issue of bonds is outstanding plus the period of the
loan represented by the temporary notes or renewal notes may not exceed 25 30 years.
Page 1 - 132LR0480(03)